Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.100

Licenses—Duration—Renewal—Failure to renew, procedure—Suspension—Conditional licenses.

(1) Licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall be renewed every two years. A license shall be renewed upon payment of a renewal fee and completion of continuing education requirements and receipt of a completed license renewal application. If a licensee fails to submit an application for renewal, the renewal fee, and proof of completion of the required continuing education, the license shall be suspended at the end of its effective term. The licensee is not allowed to perform work authorized by their license during the time that it is suspended. The licensee is allowed thirty days to submit an application for renewal, the renewal fee, and proof of completion of the required continuing education for the renewal period. Continuing education obtained during the thirty-day suspension period may be applied only to the next renewal period. If a licensee fails to submit an application for renewal, the renewal fee, and proof of completion of the required continuing education by the end of the thirty-day suspension period, the license expires. The department shall adopt rules, in consultation with the technical advisory group created under RCW 18.104.190, that allow for an extension of the thirty-day suspension period for certain situations that are beyond the control of the licensee. The rules must also allow for a retirement or inactive license.

(2) A person whose license has expired must apply for a new license as provided in this chapter. The department may waive the requirement for a written examination and on-site testing for a person whose license has expired.

(3) The department may refuse to renew a license if the licensee has not complied with an order issued by the department or has not paid a penalty imposed in accordance with this chapter, unless the order or penalty is under appeal.

(4) The department may issue a conditional license to enable a former licensee to comply with an order to correct problems with a well.

[ 2005 c 84 s 5; 1993 c 387 s 17; 1971 ex.s. c 212 s 10.]